Utah statutes.
63M-7-514.   Notification of claimant -- Suspension of proceedings.

(1)  The Utah Office for Victims of Crime shall immediately notify the claimant in writing of any award and shall forward to the Division of Finance a certified copy of the award and a warrant request for the amount of the award.  The Division of Finance shall pay the claimant the amount submitted to the division, out of the fund.  If money in the fund is temporarily depleted, claimants approved to receive awards shall be placed on a waiting list and shall receive their awards as funds are available in the order in which their awards were approved.

(2)  The reparations officer may suspend the proceedings pending disposition of a criminal prosecution that has been commenced or is imminent.

